Illinois, session 104th, SB2313.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Electric Vehicle Rebate Act is amended by 5changing Sections 10, 27, and 40 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 120/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 8    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency. 9    "Covered Area" means the counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, 10Lake, McHenry, and Will, the townships of Aux Sable and Goose 11Lake in Grundy County, and the township of Oswego in Kendall 12County. 13    "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that is exclusively 14powered by and refueled by electricity, must be plugged in to 15charge, and is legally permitted licensed to drive on all 16public roadways, including interstate highways. "Electric 17Vehicle" does not include electric mopeds, electric 18off-highway vehicles primarily intended to be driven off-road, 19including golf carts and electric vehicles with a maximum 20speed below 45 miles per hour, or hybrid electric vehicles and 21extended-range electric vehicles that are also equipped with 22conventional fueled propulsion or auxiliary engines.23    "Environmental justice community" has the same meaning,   SB2313- 2 -LRB104 11973 BDA 22067 b1based on existing methodologies and findings, used and as may 2be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its Program 3Administrator of the Illinois Solar for All Program.4    "Low income" means persons and families whose income does 5not exceed 80% of the State median income for the current State 6fiscal year, as established by the United States Department of 7Health and Human Services.8(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-820, eff. 5-13-22.) 9    (415 ILCS 120/27)10    Sec. 27. Electric vehicle rebate.11    (a) Beginning July 1, 2025 2022, and continuing as long as 12funds are available, each low-income person shall be eligible 13to apply for a rebate, in the amounts set forth below, 14following the purchase of an electric vehicle in Illinois. The 15Agency shall issue rebates consistent with the provisions of 16this Act and any implementing regulations adopted by the 17Agency. In no event shall a rebate amount exceed the purchase 18price of the vehicle.19        (1) Until July 1, 2026 Beginning July 1, 2022, a 20    $4,000 rebate for the purchase of an electric vehicle that 21    is not an electric motorcycle and a $1,500 rebate for the 22    purchase of an electric vehicle that is an electric 23    motorcycle.24        (2) Beginning July 1, 2026, a $2,000 rebate for the 25    purchase of an electric vehicle that is not an electric   SB2313- 3 -LRB104 11973 BDA 22067 b1    motorcycle and a $750 rebate for the purchase of an 2    electric vehicle that is an electric motorcycle.3        (3) Beginning July 1, 2028, a $1,500 rebate for the 4    purchase of an electric vehicle that is not an electric 5    motorcycle and a $500 rebate for the purchase of an 6    electric vehicle that is an electric motorcycle. 7        (4) Beginning July 1, 2022, a $1,500 rebate for the 8    purchase of an electric vehicle that is an electric 9    motorcycle. 10    (b) To be eligible to receive a rebate, a purchaser must:11        (1) Reside in Illinois, both at the time the vehicle 12    was purchased and at the time the rebate is issued.13        (2) Purchase an electric vehicle in Illinois on or 14    after July 1, 2022 and be the owner of the vehicle at the 15    time the rebate is issued. Rented or leased vehicles, 16    vehicles purchased from an out-of-state dealership, and 17    vehicles delivered to or received by the purchaser 18    out-of-state are not eligible for a rebate under this Act.19        (3) Apply for the rebate within 180 90 days after the 20    vehicle purchase date, and provide to the Agency proof of 21    residence, proof of vehicle ownership, and proof that the 22    vehicle was purchased in Illinois, including a copy of a 23    purchase agreement noting an Illinois seller. The 24    purchaser must notify the Agency of any changes in 25    residency or ownership of the vehicle that occur between 26    application for a rebate and issuance of a rebate.  SB2313- 4 -LRB104 11973 BDA 22067 b1        (4) Apply for the rebate during an open rebate cycle 2    as identified by the Agency.3        (5) Certify that the purchaser qualifies as 4    low-income. 5    (c) The Agency shall make available in application 6materials methods for purchasers to identify as low-income. 7The Agency shall prioritize the review of qualified 8applications from low-income purchasers and award rebates to 9qualified purchasers accordingly.10    (d) The purchaser must retain ownership of the vehicle for 11a minimum of 12 consecutive months immediately after the 12vehicle purchase date. The purchaser must continue to reside 13in Illinois during that time frame and register the vehicle in 14Illinois during that time frame. Rebate recipients who fail to 15satisfy any of the above criteria will be required to 16reimburse the Agency all or part of the original rebate amount 17and shall notify the Agency within 60 days of failing to 18satisfy the criteria.19    (e) Rebates administered under this Section shall be 20available for both new and used electric vehicles.21    (f) A rebate administered under this Act may only be 22applied for and awarded one time per vehicle identification 23number. A rebate may only be applied for and awarded once per 24purchaser in any 10-year period.25(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-820, eff. 5-13-22.)   SB2313- 5 -LRB104 11973 BDA 22067 b1    (415 ILCS 120/40)2    Sec. 40. Appropriations from the Electric Vehicle Rebate 3Fund. 4    (a) The Agency shall estimate the amount of user fees 5expected to be collected under Section 35 of this Act for each 6fiscal year. User fee funds shall be deposited into and 7distributed from the Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund in the 8following manner: 9        (1) Through fiscal year 2023, an annual amount not to 10    exceed $225,000 may be appropriated to the Agency from the 11    Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund to pay its costs of 12    administering the programs authorized by Section 27 of 13    this Act. Beginning in fiscal year 2024 and in each fiscal 14    year thereafter, an annual amount not to exceed $600,000 15    may be appropriated to the Agency from the Electric 16    Vehicle Rebate Fund to pay its costs of administering the 17    programs authorized by Section 27 of this Act. An amount 18    not to exceed $225,000 may be appropriated to the 19    Secretary of State from the Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund 20    to pay the Secretary of State's costs of administering the 21    programs authorized under this Act. 22        (2) In fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year 23    thereafter, after appropriation of the amounts authorized 24    by item (1) of subsection (a) of this Section, the 25    remaining moneys estimated to be collected during each 26    fiscal year shall be appropriated.   SB2313- 6 -LRB104 11973 BDA 22067 b1        (3) (Blank). 2        (4) Moneys appropriated to fund the programs 3    authorized in Sections 25 and 30 shall be expended only 4    after they have been collected and deposited into the 5    Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund.6    (b) Amounts appropriated to and deposited into the 7Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund from the General Revenue Fund, or 8any other fund, General Revenue Fund amounts appropriated to 9and deposited into the Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund shall be 10distributed from the Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund to fund the 11program authorized in Section 27.12(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 13103-363, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on July 151, 2025.